el: Ευκαμψία βελόνας κεντήματος με χάντρες: Εξαιρετικά εύκαμπτη; Εξαιρετικά άκαμπτη; Εύκαμπτη; Μεσαία; Άκαμπτη; Άλλο
pt-PT: Flexibilidade da agulha de contas: Extra flexível; Extra rígido; Flexível; Médio; Rígido; Outro
fr: Souplesse de l’aiguille à perler: Extra-flexible; Extra-rigide; Flexible; Moyenne; Rigide; Autre
sk-SK: Flexibilita ihly na korálky: Extra flexibilná; Extra tuhá; Flexibilná; Stredná; Tuhá; Iné
zh-TW: 串珠針彈性: 極度彈性; 極度堅硬; 彈性; 中等; 堅硬; 其他
de: Flexibilität der Perlnadel: Besonders flexibel; Besonders steif; Flexibel; Mittel; Steif; Sonstige
hr-HR: Fleksibilnost igle za perle: Iznimno fleksibilno; Iznimno kruto; Fleksibilno; Srednje; Kruto; Ostalo
bg-BG: Гъвкавост на иглата за мъниста: Изключително гъвкава; Изключително твърда; Гъвкава; Средна; Твърда; Друго
da: Perlenålens fleksibilitet: Ekstra fleksibel; Ekstra stiv; Fleksibel; Medium; Stiv; Andet
hu: Gyöngyfűző tű rugalmassága: Extra rugalmas; Extra merev; Rugalmas; Közepes; Merev; Egyéb
fi: Helmikirjontaneulan joustavuus: Erittäin joustava; Erittäin jäykkä; Joustava; Keskijäykkä; Jäykkä; Muu
ja: ビーズ針の柔軟性: 非常に柔らかい; 非常に硬い; 柔らかい; 普通; 硬い; その他
nb: Fleksibilitet i perlenålen: Ekstra fleksibel; Ekstra stiv; Fleksibel; Middels; Stiv; Annet
pl: Elastyczność igły do koralików: Bardzo elastyczna; Bardzo sztywna; Elastyczna; Średnia; Sztywna; Inne
cs: Pružnost korálkovací jehly: Extra pružná; Extra tuhá; Pružná; Střední; Tuhá; Jiné
zh-CN: 串珠针的柔韧性: 特柔韧; 特硬挺; 柔韧; 中等; 硬挺; 其他
ko: 비즈용 바늘의 유연성: 매우 유연함; 매우 뻣뻣함; 유연함; 중간; 뻣뻣함; 기타
sl-SI: Fleksibilnost igle za perlice: Zelo prilagodljiva; Zelo toga; Prilagodljiva; Srednje toga; Toga; Drugo
tr: Boncuk iğnesi esnekliği: Ekstra esnek; Ekstra sert; Esnek; Orta; Sert; Diğer
es: Flexibilidad de la aguja de abalorios: Extra flexible; Extra rígido; Flexible; Medio; Rígido; Otro
ru: Гибкость иглы для бисероплетения: Очень гибкая; Очень жесткая; Гибкая; Средняя; Жесткая; Другое
th: ความยืดหยุ่นของเข็มร้อยลูกปัด: ยืดหยุ่นเป็นพิเศษ; แข็งเป็นพิเศษ; ยืดหยุ่น; ปานกลาง; แข็ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Rijgnaald flexibiliteit: Extra flexibel; Extra stijf; Flexibel; Medium; Stijf; Overig
it: Flessibilità dell'ago per perline: Extra flessibile; Extra rigido; Flessibile; Medio; Rigido; Altro
en: Beading needle flexibility: Extra flexible; Extra stiff; Flexible; Medium; Stiff; Other
pt-BR: Flexibilidade da agulha para bordado com miçangas: Extraflexível; Extrarrígida; Flexível; Média; Rígida; Outra
lt-LT: Karoliukų vėrimo adatos lankstumas: Ypač lanksti; Ypač standi; Lanksti; Vidutinė; Standi; Kita
vi: Độ linh hoạt của kim đính hạt: Cực dẻo; Cực cứng; Dẻo; Vừa; Cứng; Khác
sv: Flexibilitet i pärlnålar: Extra flexibel; Extra styv; Flexibel; Medium; Styv; Övrigt
ro-RO: Flexibilitatea acului de mărgele: Foarte flexibil; Foarte rigid; Flexibil; Mediu; Rigid; Altele